Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $8,016,044,524 for the State School Fund.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$370,466,870 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Education for the State School Fund.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$36,599,736 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the  Department of Education from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal funds and funds  de-
scribed in section 4 of this 2021 Act, collected or received by the department for  the State
School Fund.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$676,888,870 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the  Department of Education from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the department for the State School Fund  from the Fund for Student Success
established under ORS 327.001.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$200,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from  lottery moneys transferred from
the Education Stability Fund to the State School Fund.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding ORS 327.008 and 327.013, for the biennium beginning  July
1, 2021, the Department of Education:
(1) May spend up to $968,000 from the State School  Fund for the contract described in
ORS 329.488.
(2) May spend up to $1,600,000 from the State School Fund  for purposes related to the
Oregon Virtual School District.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5514 (SB 5514-A) Page 1
(3) May spend up to  $2,850,375 from the State School Fund to provide lunches, at no
charge to the student, to students who are eligible for  reduced price lunches under the
United States Department of Agriculture’s current Income Eligibility Guidelines.
SECTION 7. The amount of $4,000,000 is  transferred from the State School Fund to the
Local Option Equalization Grants Account created in ORS 327.339.
SECTION 8. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by Senate May 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 3, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5514 (SB 5514-A) Page 2